Hawaii, session 2026, SB2312.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that transparency and accountability in government operations are fundamental to public trust.  The legislature also finds that public agencies in the State increasingly rely on private contractors to perform agency functions, including creating, maintaining, or using records critical to public oversight.  The legislature believes it is critical to prevent the circumvention of public agencies' transparency obligations through the outsourcing of their agency functions by ensuring that these records remain accessible under chapter 92F, Hawaii Revised Statutes, commonly known as the State's Uniform Information Practices Act. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to: (1)  Require contractors performing an agency function to retain records related to the performance of that function and provide agencies with access to those records; and (2)  Deem the records to be government records under the Uniform Information Practices Act. SECTION 2.  Chapter 92F, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to part II to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§92F-    Agency function contracts.  (a) Each contract with an agency to perform an agency function shall require the contractor to: (1)  Retain all records related to the performance of that function, following the agency's records retention schedule; and (2)  Provide the agency with access to those records upon request. (b)  All records retained by a contractor pursuant to this section shall be deemed government records for the purposes of this part. (c)  This section shall not apply to contracts entered into by the employees' retirement system." SECTION 3.  Section 92F-3, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new definition to be appropriately inserted and to read as follows: ""Agency function" means a service, program, or activity that an agency is authorized or required by law to perform." SECTION 4.  This Act does not affect rights and duties that matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were begun before its effective date. SECTION 5.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 6.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 3000.